Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1114
Community work release and reentry centers; private providers; bid on agreements to establish; appropriation; legislative intent.

(1) By July 1, 2026, the department shall develop a strategic plan and procedure to allow private providers to bid on agreements to establish community work release and reentry centers pursuant to the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one million dollars from the General Fund to carry out the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 14;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 70.